West Virginia, session 2025, HB2145.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of West Virginia: ARTICLE 3. PURCHASING DIVISION. §5A-3-4. Rules of director. (a) The director shall propose rules for legislative approval in accordance with the provisions of §29A-3-1 et seq. of this code to:(1) Authorize a spending unit to purchase specified commodities and services directly and prescribe the manner in which such purchases shall be made;(2) Prescribe the manner in which emergency purchases made under §5A-3-1(d) shall be reported to the director; (3) Prescribe the manner in which commodities and services shall be purchased, delivered, stored and distributed;(4) Prescribe the time for making requisitions and estimates of commodities and services, the future period which they are to cover, the form in which they shall be submitted and the manner of their authentication;(5) Prescribe the manner of inspecting all deliveries of commodities, and making chemical and physical tests of samples submitted with bids and samples of deliveries to determine compliance with specifications;(6) Prescribe the amount and type of deposit or bond to be submitted with a bid or contract and the amount of deposit or bond to be given for the faithful performance of a contract;(7) Prescribe a system whereby the director shall be required upon the payment by a vendor of an annual fee established by the director to give notice to such vendor of all bid solicitations for commodities and services of the type with respect to which such vendor specified notice was to be given: but no such fee shall exceed the cost of giving the notice to such vendor, nor shall such fee exceed the sum of $125 per fiscal year nor shall such fee be charged to persons or entities seeking only reimbursement from a spending unit or to persons or entities only seeking to accept moneys granted by a spending unit under a grant agreement Provided, That the authority to charge a fee under this section or pursuant to legislative rule as provided in this section is terminated upon the effective date of the amendments to this section enacted in 2025.(8) Prescribe that each state contract entered into by the Purchasing Division shall contain provisions for liquidated damages, remedies or provisions for the determination of the amount or amounts which the vendor shall owe as damages, in the event of default under such contract by such vendor, as determined by the director;(9) Prescribe contract management procedures for all state contracts except government construction contracts including, but not limited to, those set forth in §5-22-1 et seq. of this code;(10) Prescribe procedures by which oversight is provided to actively monitor spending unit purchases, including, but not limited to, all technology and software commodities and services exceeding $1 million, approval of change orders and final acceptance by the spending units;(11) Prescribe that each state contract entered into by the Purchasing Division contain provisions for the cancellation of the contract upon 30 days’ notice to the vendor;(12) Prescribe procedures for selling surplus commodities to the highest bidder by means of an Internet auction site;(13) Provide such other matters as may be necessary to give effect to the foregoing rules and the provisions of this article; and(14) Prescribe procedures for encumbering purchase orders to ensure that the proper account may be encumbered before sending purchase orders to vendors.(b) A person may not be employed as a state buyer unless he or she at the time of employment fulfills either of the following requirements:(1) A graduate of an accredited college or university in a field determined relevant by the director; or(2) Has at least two years’ experience in purchasing for any unit of government or for any business, commercial or industrial enterprise.Persons serving as State buyers are subject to the provisions of §29-6-1 et seq. of this code. Any director of the Purchasing Division hired after July 1, 2022, shall serve at the will and pleasure of the secretary and may not be subject to the provisions of §29-6-1 et seq. of this code. §5A-3-12. Prequalification disclosure and payment of annual fee by vendors required; form and contents; register of vendors; false certificates; penalties. (a) The director may not accept any bid received from any vendor unless the vendor has paid the annual fee specified in §5A-3-4 of this code and has filed with the director a certificate of the vendor or the certificate of a member of the vendor’s firm or, if the vendor is a corporation, the certificate of an officer, director or managing agent of the corporation, disclosing the following information:(1) If the vendor is an individual, his or her name and city and state of residence and business address, and, if he or she has associates or partners sharing in his business, their names and city and state of residence and business addresses;(2) If the vendor is a firm, the name and city and state of residence and business address of the firm;(3) If the vendor is a corporation created under the laws of this state or authorized to do business in this state, the name and business address of the corporation; (4) A statement of whether the vendor is acting as agent for some other individual, firm or corporation, and if so, a statement of the principal authorizing the representation shall be attached to the certificate or whether the vendor is doing business as another entity;(5) The vendor’s latest Dun & Bradstreet number and rating, if there is any rating as to the vendor; and(6) The vendor’s tax identification number.(b) Whenever a change occurs in the information submitted as required, the change shall be reported immediately in the same manner as required in the original disclosure certificate.(c) The certificate and information received by the director shall be public record.(d) The director may waive the above requirements in the case of any corporation listed on any nationally recognized stock exchange and in the case of any vendor who or which is the sole source for the commodity in question.(e) Any person who submits a false certificate or who knowingly files or causes to be filed with the director, a certificate containing a false statement of a material fact or omitting any material fact, is guilty of a misdemeanor and, upon conviction, shall be fined not more than $1,000, and, in the discretion of the court, confined in jail not more than one year. An individual convicted of a misdemeanor under this subsection may never hold an office of honor, trust or profit in this state, or serve as a juror. Bill Status  | Bill Tracking  | Legacy WV Code  | Bulletin Board  | District Maps  | Senate Roster  | House Roster  | Live  | Blog  | Jobs  | Links  | Home